Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 13 HOSPITAL LICENSES AND INSPECTION
§ 39-1330. Biennial election of board members — Terms of office.

On the third Tuesday of May in the next odd-numbered calendar year after the organization of any district, and on the third Tuesday of May every second year thereafter, an election shall be held which shall be known as the biennial election of the district.

At the first biennial election in any district hereafter organized and each sixth year thereafter there shall be elected by the qualified electors of the district three (3) members of the board to serve for a term of six (6) years; at the second biennial election and each sixth year thereafter there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for a term of six (6) years; at the third biennial election and each sixth year thereafter there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for terms of six (6) years.

The county clerk shall provide for holding such elections and shall appoint judges to conduct it; the county clerk shall give notice of election by publication and shall arrange such other details in connection therewith as the board may direct. The returns of the election shall be certified to and shall be canvassed and declared by the board of county commissioners. The candidate or candidates according to the number of directors to be elected, receiving the most votes shall be elected. Any new member of the board shall qualify in the same manner as members of the first board qualify.

In any election for director, if after the deadline for filing a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that only one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated for a director’s position, it shall not be necessary for the candidate to stand for election, and the board of directors of the district shall declare such candidate elected as a director, and the secretary of the board of the district shall immediately make and deliver to such person a certificate of election.

For the purpose of achieving an orderly transition to a term of six (6) years and to hold trustee elections in odd-numbered years, the following schedule shall be followed:

For trustees elected in 2005, their terms shall expire in 2011 and the terms for each of those elected in 2011 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2006, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2007, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2008, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2009, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2010, their terms shall expire in 2017 and the terms for each of those elected in 2017 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years.

§ 39-1330A, 39-1330B. One nomination — No board election — Write in candidacy — Declaration of intent. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1331. Powers and duties of board.

For and on behalf of the district the board shall have the following powers:

a. To have and use a corporate seal.

b. To have perpetual existence.

c. To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions and proceedings.

d. To purchase, acquire, dispose of and encumber real and personal property and hold lands, buildings, and all types of property, make such contracts and purchases, acquire and hold such personal property as may be necessary or convenient for its purposes, provided, however, that before any real property of such district may be sold, notice thereof must be given by publication in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county where such district is situated for three (3) consecutive weekly issues.

e. In addition to the other means providing revenue for such districts as herein provided, the board shall have the power and authority to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the district, as hereinafter provided.

f. To borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by certificates, notes or debentures, and to issue bonds in accordance with the provisions of this act.

g. To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district without an election, provided, however, that the obligations of the district shall not be increased by any refund of bonded indebtedness. Otherwise the terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds.

h. To have the management, control and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district, and the construction, installation, operation and maintenance of district improvements therein or therefor.

i. To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers and attorneys.

j. To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use; to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers herein granted.

k. To adopt and amend by-laws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state for carrying on business, objects and affairs of the board and of the district.

l.
To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to, or implied from the specific powers granted herein, including the charging of reasonable rates for services rendered to patients of said hospital or medical clinic. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this act.

§ 39-1332. Annual statement of valuation of taxable property.

On or before the third Monday in July of each year the county auditor shall deliver to the secretary of each hospital district within the county a statement showing the aggregate valuation of all the taxable property in such district, and thereafter the district board shall levy the taxes herein provided for.

§ 39-1333. Levy and collection of taxes — Initial financing.

To levy and collect taxes, as herein provided, the board shall, in each year, determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy, which when levied upon every dollar of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district, and with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds to pay for expenses of organization, purchase of necessary equipment, operation, maintenance and upkeep of the works and equipment of the district, provided, however, that said levy shall not exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property within the district for the purposes hereinbefore set forth, and provided further, that no levy shall be made in excess of four hundredths percent (.04%) of market value for assessment purposes for the purposes set forth in this section, unless the board of trustees of the district shall grant a public hearing, after notice of the time, place and purpose of said hearing has been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. Provided, that in the first year after organization, the board of a district may, for the purpose of organization, to finance general preliminary expenses of the district or for any other purpose of the hospital district law, and before making a tax levy, incur an indebtedness not exceeding in the aggregate a sum equal to three tenths percent (.3%) of market value for assessment purposes of all real and personal property within the district. To repay any such organizational indebtedness incurred, on or after March 21, 1985, the board shall have authority to levy and collect an additional tax not to exceed one tenth percent (.1%) of market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property within the district. Such additional levy shall not be used for any purpose other than repayment of the organizational indebtedness and interest thereon. Such additional levy may be imposed until the organizational indebtedness and interest thereon is paid in full.

§ 39-1334. Additional tax levies.

If it becomes necessary and expedient so to do, it shall be lawful for the board to levy additional taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve sinking fund for the purpose of accumulating moneys with which to add new buildings or necessary equipment, and to provide extensions of and betterments to the improvements of the district, and for such purposes may levy an additional tax not to exceed two hundredths of one percent (.02%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property in the district.

If the board finds it necessary to maintain the solvency of a facility or facilities, the board is authorized to levy additional taxes and collect revenue in excess of the limitations prescribed by section 39-1333, Idaho Code, for the sole purpose of retiring current or past due obligations accruing where operating expenses for such a facility or facilities have exceeded all available sources of revenue in the fiscal year preceding the anticipated date of levy; provided, that any such additional levy shall be authorized only if approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors of the district voting at an election called and conducted in the manner specified in sections 39-1339 through 39-1342, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1335. Tax levy to pay interest on bonds and other obligations.

In addition to the taxes hereinbefore provided for, the said board shall have the authority to levy and collect taxes as herein provided in each year sufficient to promptly pay in full, when due, all interest on the principal of bond and other obligations of the district authorized as provided by sections 39-1338 and 39-1339[, Idaho Code,] of this act.

§ 39-1336. Maturing indebtedness a consideration in annual levies.

The board in certifying annual levies as herein provided, shall take into account maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing bonds, and interest on bonds and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof.

§ 39-1337. Tax rate — Certification — Levy and collection.

The board shall, on or before the first day of September of each year, certify to the board of commissioners the rate so fixed with corrections that at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes for county purposes such board of county commissioners shall levy such taxes upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners at the rate so fixed and determined. It shall be the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the taxes provided in this act, and it shall be the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the manner and form and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected, and when collected, to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection, and the payment of such collection shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof, to the credit of the district.

§ 39-1338. Bond issues authorized — Form and terms.

To carry out the purposes of this act and to pay the necessary expenses of the district, the board is hereby authorized to issue negotiable coupon bonds of the district. Bonds shall bear interest payable semiannually, and shall be due and payable serially either annually or semiannually, commencing not later than three (3) years from the date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their payment and redemption, shall be determined by the board. If the board so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity, upon payment of a premium not exceeding three per cent (3%) of the net principal thereof. Said bonds shall be executed in the name of, and on behalf of, the district and signed by the chairman of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto, and attested by the secretary of the board. Said bonds shall be in such denominations as the board shall determine, and the bonds and coupons thereto attached shall be payable to bearer. Interest coupons shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman of the board. In all other respects, said bonds shall be issued, sold and paid in accordance with the provisions of chapter 2, title 57, Idaho Code, known as the “Municipal Bond Law” of the state of Idaho.

§ 39-1339. Creation of indebtedness for works, improvements or equipment — Election on proposed indebtedness — Indebtedness or liability without election.

Whenever the board of the hospital district shall by resolution determine that it is in the interest of said district and in the public interest or necessity to purchase, contract, lease or construct or otherwise acquire facilities, equipment, technology and real property for health care operations or make any contract with the United States or other persons or corporations, public or private, municipalities or governmental subdivisions to carry out the said public works, acquisitions, improvements, objects or purposes of said district requiring the creation of an indebtedness payable out of taxes of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, and in any event when the indebtedness will exceed the income and revenue provided for the year, the board shall order the submission of the proposition of issuing such obligations or bonds or creating other indebtedness payable out of taxes to the qualified electors of the district at an election held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, for that purpose. The declaration of public interest or necessity, herein required, and the provision for the holding of such election may be included within one (1) and the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to such declaration of public interest or necessity shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated costs of the works, improvements, or medical or business equipment, as the case may be, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on such indebtedness. Such resolutions shall also fix the date upon which such election shall be held, and the manner of holding the same in accordance with the provisions of title 34, Idaho Code, and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness; such resolution shall designate the polling place or places and the county clerk shall appoint judges, provided, however, that no district shall issue or have outstanding its coupon bonds in excess of two percent (2%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the real and personal property within the said district, according to the assessment of the year preceding any such issuance of such evidence of indebtedness for any or all of the propositions specified in this election, provided, however, that such bonds shall not be issued, nor shall any indebtedness be incurred, at any time that there shall be a bond issue outstanding and unpaid for the construction, acquisition or maintenance of a county hospital in the county in which such district is organized.

No election shall be required for any lease or other transaction entered into between the hospital district and the Idaho health facilities authority. Notwithstanding any other provision, the hospital district shall be entitled to enter into a lease or other transaction regardless of the amount involved with the Idaho health facilities authority upon determination by the board of the hospital district that it is in the interest of the hospital district and best interests of the public to enter into such lease or other transaction.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section and provided that no property tax revenues shall be used for payment of indebtedness authorized by this subsection, district hospitals, ancillary to their operations and in furtherance of health care needs in their service areas, may incur indebtedness or liability without an election to purchase, contract, lease or construct or otherwise acquire facilities, equipment, technology and real property for health care operations.

§ 39-1340. Notices of election on proposed indebtedness.

When such election is ordered to be held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, the board shall direct the county clerk as provided in section 34-1406, Idaho Code, to give notice by publication once not less than twelve (12) days prior to the election and a second time not less than five (5) days prior to the election published in one (1) or more newspapers within the district, if a newspaper is published therein. Said notices shall recite the action of the board in deciding to bond the district, the purpose thereof and the amount of the bonds supposed to be issued, the estimated costs of the works or improvements as the case may be, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on such indebtedness, and shall also specify the date of the election and the time during which the polls shall be open. Notices shall also list the polling places.

§ 39-1341. Conduct of election for proposed indebtedness.

The county clerk shall conduct the election in a manner prescribed by law in title 34, Idaho Code. The returns thereof shall be canvassed and the results thereof shall be declared by the board of county commissioners.

§ 39-1342. Indebtedness incurred upon favorable vote — Resubmission of proposition not received favorably.

In the event that it shall appear from said returns that two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors of the district voting at such election shall have voted in favor of such proposition or any proposition submitted hereunder at such election, the district shall thereupon be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, enter into such contract or issue and sell bonds of the district, as the case may be, all for the purpose or purposes, and object or objects provided for in the propositions submitted hereunder and in the resolution therefor and in the amount so provided at a rate of interest not exceeding the rate of interest recited in such resolution. The submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same, or other propositions, at subsequent election or elections called for such purpose at any time, held subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1343. Officials and sureties liable on bond.

All county officers entrusted with the assessment, collection, paying over or custody of taxes of any hospital district within the county, and their sureties, shall be liable upon their official bonds for the faithful performance of their duties in the assessment, collection and safe keeping of such hospital district taxes.

§ 39-1344. Taxes levied a lien — Collection.

All taxes levied by hospital districts, shall become a lien upon the property so assessed from the date of such assessment, and shall be due and payable at the time state and county taxes are due and payable and in all respects are to be collected in the same way, except that the assessor must keep a separate list or assessment roll therefor.

§ 39-1345. Due and delinquent dates of taxes assessed.

All hospital district taxes levied and assessed under the provisions of this act shall become due and delinquent and shall attach to and become a lien on the real property assessed at the same time as state and county taxes. All the provisions of the Idaho Code governing and assessing and collecting state and county taxes are hereby made applicable to the assessment and collection of said hospital district taxes wherever the same are not inconsistent with the provisions of this act.

§ 39-1346. Treasurer of hospital district — Duties.

It is hereby made the duty of the treasurer of the hospital district to keep account with such district, to place to the credit of such district all moneys received by him from the collector of taxes, or from any other officer charged with the collection of taxes as the proceeds of taxes levied by the hospital board or from any other sources and of all other moneys belonging to such district and to pay over all moneys belonging to the district by legally drawn warrants or orders of the district officer entitled to draw the same.

§ 39-1346A. [Reserved.]

It shall be the duty of the treasurer of a hospital district to invest idle moneys of such hospital. Such investment of idle moneys shall be limited to investments that carry an A rating or better by a commonly known rating service and that are authorized by the legislature for the state treasurer pursuant to sections 67-1210 and 67-1210A, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1347. Warrants and drafts — Payment.

The secretary shall countersign all drafts and warrants on the district treasury, and no payment of district funds shall be made except on draft or warrant countersigned by him. He shall not countersign any such draft or warrant until he has found that payment has been legally authorized; that the money therefor has been duly appropriated and that such appropriation has not been exhausted.

Such warrants shall be drawn by, and countersigned upon the order of the president of the hospital board, or, in his absence, the other member of the board; but no drafts or warrants shall be drawn, except upon the appropriation of the board, nor in excess of the moneys actually in the district treasury; except that warrants may be issued in anticipation of the collection of taxes, but not in excess of seventy-five per cent (75%) of the amount of the levy therefor, nor shall any warrants be issued nor indebtedness incurred in anticipation of such levy.

When a warrant is presented for payment, if there is money in the treasury for the purpose, the treasurer must pay the same and write on the face thereof, “paid”, the date of payment and sign his name thereto.

§ 39-1348. Warrants — Inability to pay — Indorsement.

When any warrant is presented to the district treasurer for payment, and the same is not paid for want of funds, the treasurer must endorse on the back of said warrant, “not paid for want of funds,” and shall write thereon the day of presentation and sign his name thereto, and warrants so endorsed by the treasurer shall draw interest at a rate established by the board of the hospital district from the date of endorsement until paid.

§ 39-1349. Bulletin board — Notices posted for presentation of district warrants.

The district treasurer shall provide himself, at the expense of the district, with a bulletin board, across the top of which shall be printed or inscribed the words “. . . . hospital district warrant bulletin.” It shall be the duty of the treasurer to keep such bulletin board conspicuously, securely and permanently in place in his office, and thereupon to place in a manner which will insure continuous notice of not less than sixty (60) days, all notices issued by him, whether written or printed, calling for the presentation of district warrants for payment.

§ 39-1350. Notice warrants will be paid on presentation.

Whenever there is an amount to the credit of the district fund, as shown by the books of the treasurer, sufficient to pay the warrant or warrants next entitled to payment therefrom, the treasurer shall immediately place in his office, as provided in the preceding section, a notice that such warrant or warrants will be paid on presentation, stating therein the number and series of any such warrants; and the treasurer shall thereupon send, by mail, to the record holder of such warrant, in case such holder shall have left with the treasurer his address for that purpose, notice that such warrant will be paid on presentation.

§ 39-1351. Interest on warrants — Cessation thirty days from posting notice.

Interest on any warrant shall cease on the expiration of thirty (30) days from the time of posting of the notice provided for in the last preceding section; and for all sums which may be paid by the treasurer, as interest on any warrant or warrants, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the earliest date at which there were sufficient funds with which to have called and paid the same, such treasurer and his sureties shall be liable upon his official bond.

§ 39-1352. Notation of interest amount on warrant.

When the treasurer pays any warrant on which any interest is due, he must note on the warrant the amount of interest paid thereon and enter on his account the amount of such interest distinct from the principal.

§ 39-1353. Power to issue and sell tax anticipation notes or bonds.

Hospital districts created and existing under this chapter shall have the further power to issue and sell tax anticipation notes or bonds in the manner, and for the purposes and to the extent authorized by chapter 31 of title 63 of Idaho Code.

§ 39-1353a. Practice of medicine not authorized.

Anything to the contrary hereinabove notwithstanding, this act shall not be construed to permit or authorize any hospital district or hospital therein in the state of Idaho directly or indirectly to engage in the practice of medicine as defined in chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, which privilege is reserved exclusively to persons licensed for that purpose pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1354. Annexation of territory not having a tax supported hospital — Petitions and signatures — Election.

Any area contiguous to a hospital district which does not support another tax supported hospital may become annexed to the district by petition and election.

A petition for annexation shall comply with the requirements of section 39-1320, Idaho Code, in the area seeking to become annexed to the hospital district. A true copy of the petition shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the district, and to the board of county commissioners in each county affected. The board of trustees of the hospital district may approve or disapprove such petition, and shall give notice of its decision to the board of county commissioners in each county affected.

When it has received notice of approval of the board of trustees of the district, the board of county commissioners in the county or counties in which the petition arose shall enter its order calling for an election on the question. The election shall be held in the area proposed to be annexed. Notice of the election shall be given, the election shall be conducted, and the returns thereof canvassed as provided in sections 39-1323, 39-1324 and 39-1325, Idaho Code. The ballot shall bear the question: “Shall .... become part of the .... hospital district .... Yes” and “Shall .... become part of the .... hospital district .... No” each followed by a box in which the voter may express his choice by marking a cross. The proposal shall be deemed approved only if the majority of the votes cast is in the affirmative.

If the proposal has been approved at the election, the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district is located following annexation shall enter its order amending the boundaries of the district, and a copy shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the hospital district. Annexation shall be effective as of the date of the last such order entered.

Such other notices as may be required by law shall be filed by the board of trustees of the hospital district with the state tax commission within ten (10) days of the effective date of the change, including a legal description and map of the altered boundaries.

Addition of new territory to an existing hospital district shall not be considered an initial establishment. The existing board of trustees shall continue to serve for the term for which elected. When a vacancy occurs, appointment shall be made as provided in section 39-1326, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1355. Existing tax supported hospitals may consolidate.

The ownership and operation of any municipal, city/county, county, district, or tax supported community hospital or medical clinic may be consolidated with an established hospital district by majority vote of the qualified electors of the established hospital district and of the political subdivision having jurisdiction over such other tax supported hospital according to procedure set forth in section 39-1354, Idaho Code. A true copy of the petition and the established hospital district board’s notice of approval or disapproval shall be sent to the governing body of the political subdivision having jurisdiction over a petitioning hospital. A true copy of that petition shall, at the same time, be sent to the governing body of the nonpetitioning hospital. When the notice carries the approval of the boards, or other governing bodies of both hospitals, that governing body shall conduct the election and give notice of the results to the hospital district board and the relevant boards of county commissioners as provided in section 39-1354, Idaho Code. As a result of any such consolidation, the boundaries of the hospital district remaining after consolidation shall be expanded to include the political subdivision which previously had jurisdiction over the consolidated hospital or medical clinic.

§ 39-1356. Equalization of levy between consolidating hospitals.

When two (2) districts’ hospitals or medical clinics have agreed to consolidate, the tax levies of the two (2) hospitals will be equalized in the following manner: the certified budget figures from ad valorem taxes of the district will be added together. The resulting figure will provide the base budget amount for the new consolidated district. In any such consolidation, the existing bonded debt of any district or districts shall not become the obligation of the proposed consolidated hospital district. The debt shall remain an obligation of the property which incurred the indebtedness.

§ 39-1356A. Hospital districts in more than one county. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1357. Adjustment of boundary lines or consolidation of hospital districts.

When there are two (2) or more hospital districts, which have at least one (1) common boundary, the boards of trustees of the hospital districts, meeting together, may determine that it is in the best interest of the qualified electors and prospective hospital patients that the boundary lines be adjusted or that the districts be consolidated, as herein provided.

The boards of trustees shall jointly prepare a petition describing the boundaries of the existing hospital districts, the names of the existing hospital districts, and praying for the reorganization of the territory therein described as one (1) or more hospital districts to be known as the “.... hospital district or districts” and with boundaries as set forth in the petition.

The petition shall be signed by the chairpersons of the hospital boards upon majority approval of the respective boards involved in the boundary adjustment or consolidation.

The petition shall be forwarded to the clerk of the board of county commissioners in each of the counties affected who shall verify the signatures, and shall file the petition. Thereupon, the board of county commissioners in each of the counties affected shall proceed with the hearing and resolution as outlined in sections 39-1320, 39-1321 and 39-1322, Idaho Code, and an election in the manner required for the establishment of a hospital district.

In the order granting the petition and adjusting the boundaries or establishing consolidation, the board of county commissioners in all counties affected shall certify the new boundaries and the name of the district or districts.

A copy of the order shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the hospital districts involved.

Such other notices as may be required by law shall be filed by the board of trustees of the district, including a legal description and map of altered boundaries to be filed with the state tax commission within ten (10) days of the effective date of the change.

Following boundary adjustment, the board of county commissioners within five (5) days shall take action to reaffirm members of the board of trustees, or to appoint members of the board or boards, who shall be chosen from the members of the boards initiating the boundary adjustment to the extent possible. These trustees shall serve until the next annual election of trustees or until their successors are elected and qualified as provided in section 39-1326, Idaho Code. The board or boards of trustees shall be sworn by a member of the board of county commissioners.

Following a consolidation, the board of county commissioners within five (5) days shall appoint the members of the first board of trustees, who shall be chosen from the members of the boards of the consolidated districts and who shall serve until the next annual election of trustees or until their successors are elected and qualified. The board shall be sworn by a member of the board of county commissioners.

§ 39-1358 — 39-1389. Hospital districts established — Procedure. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1390. Reports to law enforcement agencies of certain types of injuries.

As soon as treatment permits, any person operating a hospital or other medical treatment facility, or any physician, resident on a hospital staff, intern, physician assistant, nurse or emergency medical technician, shall notify the local law enforcement agency of that jurisdiction upon the treatment of or request for treatment of a person when the reporting person has reason to believe that the person treated or requesting treatment has received:

Any injury inflicted by means of a firearm; or

Any injury indicating that the person may be a victim of a criminal offense.

The report provided to the law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include the name and address of the injured person, the character and extent of the person’s injuries, and the medical basis for making the report. Provided however, that when an adult injured person is being seen for the purposes of administration of an anonymous sexual assault evidence kit pursuant to section 67-2919, Idaho Code, the name, address, and any other personally identifying information of the adult injured person shall not be included in the report.

Any person operating a medical facility, or any physician, resident on a hospital staff, intern, physician assistant, nurse or emergency medical technician, shall be held harmless from any civil liability for reasonable compliance with the provisions of this section.

§ 39-1391. Emergency treatment without admission — Liability.

Any hospital licensed in this state may provide to any person appearing or represented to be seriously sick or injured, without admission of such person to the hospital and without the immediate presence of a licensed physician and surgeon, such emergency treatment and care or, if such hospital does not maintain and operate an emergency department, such first aid services and care as may be indicated, considering the facilities and personnel available. Neither any hospital nor its agents or employees providing such services, pursuant to standby orders duly promulgated by the medical staff of said hospital, shall be deemed, by so doing, to be engaged in the practice of medicine, nor shall any such hospital, its agents or employees, or any physician be held liable in any civil action arising out of the furnishing of such services and care, in the absence of gross negligence under the existing circumstances.

§ 39-1391a. Emergency treatment not to constitute admission.

The furnishing of emergency or first aid services and care as permitted by section 39-1391[, Idaho Code,] shall not in and of itself constitute admission to such hospital of the person receiving such services and care, nor shall such hospital, its employees, or any physician be subject to civil suit for abandonment or failure to provide care if, upon examination by a licensed physician and surgeon, it is determined by such physician, in the good faith exercise of his professional judgment, that the admission of any person receiving or presented for such services and care is not advisable or required.

§ 39-1391b. Emergency treatment by hospital not required — Discrimination prohibited.

Nothing in this act shall be deemed to require any hospital to provide facilities or personnel for the furnishing of such emergency or first aid services and care or to furnish such services and care, without admission by a licensed physician and surgeon, to any person who may request the same; provided, however, that emergency or first aid services and care shall not be refused to any person by reason of race, creed, national origin or financial ability to pay therefor.

§ 39-1391c. Immunity from civil liability.

Any licensed physician and surgeon shall be conclusively presumed to be qualified to undertake and to furnish any emergency medical or surgical care and treatment, regardless of the specialty training or skills which might otherwise be preferred for care and treatment of the particular patient, whenever, in the good faith judgment of such physician and surgeon, the condition and best interests of the patient require such physician and surgeon to undertake such care and treatment, and, in the absence of gross negligence under the existing circumstances, no physician so proceeding nor any hospital where such care and treatment is provided shall be held liable in any civil action arising out of the furnishing of such emergency care and treatment.

Nothing in this act shall be deemed to require any physician to undertake to or to furnish medical care and treatment, whether on an emergency basis or otherwise, to any person requesting or presented for such care and treatment, nor shall any such physician be held liable in any civil action by reason of his refraining from the furnishing of such care and treatment or referring the same to a specialist or other physician believed by him to be more uniquely or appropriately experienced and qualified. Neither shall any physician responding to any request for emergency care be held liable in any civil action by reason of failure to so respond with any greater promptness than may be reasonably required or expected, under the existing circumstances, of physicians and surgeons practicing in the particular community where such care and treatment is to be furnished.

§ 39-1392. Statement of policy.

To encourage research, discipline and medical study by certain health care organizations for the purposes of reducing morbidity and mortality, enforcing and improving the standards of medical practice in the state of Idaho, certain records of such health care organizations shall be confidential and privileged as set forth in this chapter.